Washington statutes.
RCW 44.80.050

Expenses—Vouchers.

Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the director. Vouchers may be drawn on funds appropriated by law for the office. The senate and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for legislative expenses to the office.

[ 2012 c 113 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.